Maryland, session 2025, HB0937.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 11–101(a–4) and (c–6) through (c–12) of Article – Tax – General of the
Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 11–101(a–5) and (c–8) through
(c–14), respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Public Safety
5–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) (1) “Firearm” means:
(i) a weapon that expels, is designed to expel, or may readily be
converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive;
(ii) the frame or receiver of such a weapon; or
(iii) an unfinished frame or receiver, as defined in § 5–701 of this title.
(2) “Firearm” includes a starter gun.
5–133.1.
(a) In this section, “ammunition” means a cartridge, shell, or any other device
containing explosive or incendiary material designed and intended for use in a firearm.
Article – Tax – General
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(A–4) “AMMUNITION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–133.1 OF THE PUBLIC
SAFETY ARTICLE.
(C–6) “FIREARM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–101 OF THE PUBLIC
SAFETY ARTICLE.
(C–7) “FIREARM ACCESSORY” MEANS:
(1) A MAGAZINE OR MAGAZINE LOADER;

HOUSE BILL 937 3
(2) A FIREARM SCOPE OR OPTIC;
(3) A STOCK;
(4) A GRIP;
(5) A HANDGUARD; OR
(6) BODY ARMOR.
11–104.
(L) THE SALES AND USE TAX RATE IS 12% OF THE TAXABLE PRICE FOR A
FIREARM, A FIREARM ACCESSORY, AND AMMUNITION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.